Missouri, session 2026, SB1391.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 547.370, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 547.370,
to read as follows:
547.370. 1. [When a motion is filed as provided in
section 547.360 to set aside a sentence of death,] Whenever
the death penalty is imposed in any case, the circuit court
shall, at the time it imposes sentence and judgment, find on
the record whether the [movant] defendant is indigent. If
the [movant] defendant is indigent, the court shall, without
delay, cause to be appointed two counsel to represent the
[movant] defendant in the preparation and litigation of a
defendant's motion under Missouri supreme court rule 24.035
or 29.15. If [movant] the defendant seeks to reject the
appointment of counsel, the court shall find on the record,
after a hearing[,] if necessary, whether the [movant]
defendant is able to competently decide whether to accept or
reject the appointment and whether the [movant] defendant
rejected the offer with the understanding of its legal
consequences. Unless the [movant] defendant is so competent
and understands the legal consequences, [movant] defendant
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1391 2
shall not be permitted to reject the appointment of
counsel. If the defendant is not indigent, the court may
enter an order denying the appointment of counsel.
2. All counsel appointed as provided in this section
shall be members of The Missouri Bar or shall be admitted to
practice in the particular case as provided in Missouri
supreme court rule 9. At least one of the counsel shall
meet the following qualifications:
(1) Have attended and successfully completed within
two years immediately preceding the appointment at least
twelve hours of training or educational programs on the
postconviction phase of a criminal case and federal and
state aspects of cases in which the death penalty is sought;
and
(2) Have at least three years litigation experience in
the field of criminal law and three years litigation
experience in the field of postconviction law; and
(3) Have participated as counsel or co-counsel to
final judgment in at least five postconviction motions
involving class A felonies in either state or federal trial
courts; [and]
(4) Have participated in either state or federal court
as counsel or co-counsel to final judgment in at least:
(a) Three felony jury trials; or
(b) Five direct criminal appeals in felony cases; and
(5) Have been a member of the Missouri Bar for a
period of at least five years.
Upon a showing of good cause, the circuit court may appoint
other counsel whose background, knowledge, or experience
would otherwise enable the counsel to properly represent the
defendant in any motion made under Missouri supreme court

SB 1391 3
rule 24.035 or 29.15, with due consideration of the
seriousness of the penalty and the unique and complex nature
of the litigation.
Counsel shall certify to the state public defender in such
form as the defender may require that counsel meets the
qualifications of this section prior to filing counsel's
entry of appearance in the case.
3. Counsel appointed to represent the [movant]
defendant shall not have represented the [movant] defendant
at trial [or on], and shall not represent the defendant in
the direct appeal therefrom.
4. As to any counsel appointed as provided in this
section, the state public defender shall provide counsel
with reasonable compensation and shall provide reasonable
and necessary litigation expenses.
5. This section shall apply whenever the death penalty
is imposed in any case and to any motions under Missouri
supreme court rule 24.035 or 29.15 filed by a defendant
challenging a sentence of death.
6. The state shall comply with any additional
requirements in 28 U.S.C. Section 2261 and 2265 and 28 CFR
Section 26.22 that are not specifically contained in this
section.
✓